Illinois, session 104th, HB4831.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Sections 16-1, 16-2, 16-3, 16-4, and 16-5 and by 6adding Section 16-2.5 as follows: 7    (305 ILCS 5/16-1)8    Sec. 16-1. Benefits for humanitarian immigrants and 9foreign-born victims of trafficking, torture, or other serious 10crimes. In order to protect humanitarian immigrants without 11eligibility for federal public benefits and persons who are 12foreign-born victims of trafficking, torture, or other serious 13crimes and to reduce the risk of further harm, exploitation, 14and re-trafficking, beginning on the effective date of this 15amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly January 1, 2018, 16cash assistance provided under the Temporary Assistance for 17Needy Families program established under Article IV of this 18Code and benefits provided under the federal Supplemental 19Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) shall be provided to such 20persons and their derivative family members to the same extent 21cash assistance and SNAP benefits are provided to United 22States citizens individuals who are admitted to the United 23States as refugees under Section 1157 of Title 8 of the United   HB4831- 2 -LRB104 19919 KTG 33369 b1States Code. To the extent that federal funding is not 2available, any cash assistance or SNAP benefits provided under 3this Article shall be paid from State funds. If changes made in 4this Section require federal approval, they shall not take 5effect until such approval has been received.6(Source: P.A. 99-870, eff. 8-22-16.) 7    (305 ILCS 5/16-2)8    Sec. 16-2. Eligibility for cash assistance. Subject to 9available funding, a foreign-born victim of trafficking, 10torture, or other serious crimes and the individual's 11derivative family members are eligible for cash assistance or 12SNAP benefits under this Article if the individual:13        (a) is not eligible, due to immigration status, for 14    comparable federal cash assistance or SNAP benefits and 15    has filed and been approved for, or is awaiting final 16    determination regarding: 17            (1) a formal application for T Nonimmigrant status 18        with the appropriate federal agency pursuant to 19        Section 1101(a)(15)(T) of Title 8 of the United States 20        Code, or is otherwise taking steps to meet the 21        conditions for federal benefits eligibility under 22        Section 7105 of Title 22 of the United States Code; 23            (2) a formal application with the appropriate 24        federal agency for status pursuant to Section 25        1101(a)(15)(U) of Title 8 of the United States Code;   HB4831- 3 -LRB104 19919 KTG 33369 b1        or 2            (3) a formal application with the appropriate 3        federal agency for status under Section 1158 of Title 4        8 of the United States Code; and 5        (b) is otherwise eligible for cash assistance or SNAP 6    benefits, as applicable. 7    A single adult without derivative family members shall 8only be eligible for cash assistance or SNAP benefits under 9this Article if the individual is not eligible, due to 10immigration status, for comparable federal cash assistance or 11SNAP benefits and has filed and been approved for, or is 12awaiting final determination regarding: 13        (i) a formal application for T Nonimmigrant status 14    with the appropriate federal agency pursuant to Section 15    1101(a)(15)(T) of Title 8 of the United States Code, or is 16    otherwise taking steps to meet the conditions for federal 17    benefits eligibility under Section 7105 of Title 22 of the 18    United States Code; or19        (ii) a formal application with the appropriate federal 20    agency for status pursuant to Section 1101(a)(15)(U) of 21    Title 8 of the United States Code. 22    Any individual, including any derivative family members, 23residing in an institution or other setting that provides the 24majority of the individual's daily meals is not eligible for 25SNAP benefits.26(Source: P.A. 103-588, eff. 6-5-24; 104-2, eff. 6-16-25.)   HB4831- 4 -LRB104 19919 KTG 33369 b1    (305 ILCS 5/16-2.5 new)2    Sec. 16-2.5. Eligibility for SNAP benefits.3    (a) Subject to available funding, a humanitarian immigrant 4or foreign-born victim of trafficking, torture, or other 5serious crimes and the individual's derivative family members, 6if applicable, are eligible for SNAP benefits under this 7Article if the applicant is not eligible for federal SNAP 8benefits solely due to citizenship or immigration status 9requirements but otherwise meets the financial and 10nonfinancial factors of eligibility for SNAP, and either:11        (1) the individual has filed, or is awaiting final 12    determination regarding:13            (A) a formal application for T Nonimmigrant status 14        with the appropriate federal agency in accordance with 15        Section 1101(a)(15)(T) of Title 8 of the United States 16        Code, or is otherwise taking steps to meet the 17        conditions for federal benefits eligibility under 18        Section 7105 of Title 22 of the United States Code;19            (B) a formal application with the appropriate 20        federal agency for status in accordance with Section 21        1101(a)(15)(U) of Title 8 of the United States Code; 22        or23            (C) a formal application with the appropriate 24        federal agency for status in accordance with Section 25        1158 of Title 8 of the United States Code; or  HB4831- 5 -LRB104 19919 KTG 33369 b1        (2) the individual is:2            (A) a refugee under Section 1157 of Title 8 of the 3        United States Code;4            (B) an individual who has been granted asylum 5        under Section 1158 of Title 8 of the United States 6        Code;7            (C) an individual whose deportation is being 8        withheld under Section 243(h) of the Immigration and 9        Nationality Act as in effect prior to April 1, 1997, or 10        whose removal is withheld under Section 1231(b)(3) of 11        Title 8 of the United States Code;12            (D)(i) a spouse, widow, or child of a U.S. citizen 13        or a spouse or child of a lawful permanent resident who 14        has been battered or subjected to extreme cruelty by 15        the U.S. citizen or lawful permanent resident or by a 16        member of that relative's family who lived with them, 17        and the individual no longer lives with the abuser or 18        plans to live separately within one month of receipt 19        of assistance and whose need for assistance is due, at 20        least in part, to the abuse, or (ii) an individual 21        described in 8 U.S.C. 1641(c) and 22 U.S.C. 22        7105(b)(1)(C);23            (E) an individual who has been approved for T 24        Nonimmigrant status with the appropriate federal 25        agency under Section 1101(a)(15)(T) of Title 8 of the 26        United States Code;  HB4831- 6 -LRB104 19919 KTG 33369 b1            (F) an individual who has been approved for U 2        Nonimmigrant status with the appropriate federal 3        agency under Section 1101(a)(15)(U) of Title 8 of the 4        United States Code;5            (G) an American Indian born in Canada who 6        possesses at least 50% of blood of the American Indian 7        race to whom the provisions of Section 1359 of Title 8 8        of the United States Code apply;9            (H) a member of an Indian tribe as defined in 10        Section 5304(e) of Title 25 of the United States Code 11        which is recognized as eligible for the special 12        programs and services provided by the U.S. to Indians 13        because of their status as Indians;14            (I)(i) a Hmong or Highland Laotian tribal member 15        lawfully residing in the U.S. who was a member of a 16        Hmong or Highland Laotian tribe between August 5, 17        1964, and ending May 7, 1975;18            (ii) the spouse, or surviving spouse of such Hmong 19        or Highland Laotian who is deceased; or20            (iii) an unmarried dependent child of such Hmong 21        or Highland Laotian who is under the age of 18 or if a 22        full-time student under the age of 22; an unmarried 23        child under the age of 18 or if a full-time student 24        under the age of 22 of such a deceased Hmong or 25        Highland Laotian provided the child was dependent upon 26        him or her at the time of his or her death; or an   HB4831- 7 -LRB104 19919 KTG 33369 b1        unmarried disabled child age 18 or older if the child 2        was disabled and dependent on the person prior to the 3        child's 18th birthday. For purposes of this item 4        (iii), "child" means the legally adopted or biological 5        child of the person described in item (i);6            (J) an Iraqi or Afghan special immigrant under 8 7        U.S.C. 1101(a)(27);8            (K) an individual who is granted conditional entry 9        pursuant to section 203(a)(7) of the INA as in effect 10        prior to April 1, 1980;11            (L) an individual who is granted parole into the 12        U.S. under 8 U.S.C. 1182(d)(5) for a period of at least 13        1 year; or14            (M) a lawful permanent resident under 8 U.S.C. 15        1259, known as legalization through "registry."16    (b) Any individual, including any derivative family 17members, residing in an institution or other setting that 18provides the majority of the individual's daily meals is not 19eligible for SNAP benefits.  20    (305 ILCS 5/16-3)21    Sec. 16-3. Determination of eligibility. (a) The 22Department shall determine that an applicant for cash 23assistance provided under Section 16-2 of this Article or SNAP 24benefits provided under Section 16-2.5 of this Article is 25eligible for such benefits if the applicant meets the income   HB4831- 8 -LRB104 19919 KTG 33369 b1guidelines and is otherwise eligible and either: (1) the 2applicant has filed: 3            (1) (A) an application for T Nonimmigrant status 4        with the appropriate federal agency pursuant to 5        Section 1101(a)(15)(T) of Title 8 of the United States 6        Code, or is otherwise taking steps to meet the 7        conditions for federal benefits eligibility under 8        Section 7105 of Title 22 of the United States Code; 9            (2) (B) a formal application with the appropriate 10        federal agency for status pursuant to Section 11        1101(a)(15)(U) of Title 8 of the United States Code; 12        or 13            (3) (C) a formal application with the appropriate 14        federal agency for status under Section 1158 of Title 15        8 of the United States Code. ; or 16        (2) the applicant, or a representative of the 17    applicant if the applicant is not competent, has provided 18    to the Department:19            (A) a sworn statement that he or she is a 20        foreign-born victim of trafficking, torture, or other 21        serious crimes; and22            (B) at least one item of additional credible 23        evidence, including, but not limited to, any of the 24        following:25                (i) police, government agency, or court 26            records or files;  HB4831- 9 -LRB104 19919 KTG 33369 b1                (ii) news articles;2                (iii) documentation from a social services, 3            trafficking, domestic violence program or rape 4            crisis center, or a legal, clinical, medical, or 5            other professional from whom the applicant or 6            recipient has sought assistance in dealing with 7            the crime;8                (iv) a statement from any other individual 9            with knowledge of the circumstances that provided 10            the basis for the claim;11                (v) physical evidence;12                (vi) a copy of a completed visa application; 13            or14                (vii) written notice from the federal agency 15            of receipt of the visa application.16    (b) The Department may, in its discretion, provide cash 17assistance or SNAP benefits pursuant to this Article to an 18applicant who cannot provide additional evidence as set forth 19in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subsection (a) if:20        (1) the applicant, or a representative of the 21    applicant if the applicant is not competent, has provided 22    a sworn statement that he or she is a foreign-born victim 23    of trafficking, torture, or other serious crimes; and24        (2) the Department determines that the applicant is 25    credible.26(Source: P.A. 99-870, eff. 8-22-16.)   HB4831- 10 -LRB104 19919 KTG 33369 b1    (305 ILCS 5/16-4)2    Sec. 16-4. Work requirements and exemptions.3    (a) Persons who are foreign-born victims of trafficking, 4torture, or other serious crimes and who are receiving cash 5assistance or SNAP benefits under this Article shall be 6subject to the same work requirements and work requirement 7exemptions as other recipients of cash assistance or SNAP 8benefits, provided that compliance with these requirements is 9authorized by law. 10    (b) A person receiving cash assistance or SNAP benefits 11under this Article who is a foreign-born victim of 12trafficking, torture, or other serious crimes shall be 13exempted from any work requirements if:14        (1) physical or psychological trauma related to or 15    arising from the trafficking, torture, or other serious 16    crimes impedes his or her ability to comply; or . 17        (2) the person does not have legal authorization to 18    work. 19(Source: P.A. 99-870, eff. 8-22-16.) 20    (305 ILCS 5/16-5)21    Sec. 16-5. Termination of benefits. (a) Any cash 22assistance provided under Section 16-2 of this Article or SNAP 23benefits provided under Section 16-2.5 of this Article to a 24humanitarian immigrant or a person who is a foreign-born   HB4831- 11 -LRB104 19919 KTG 33369 b1victim of trafficking, torture, or other serious crimes and 2his or her derivative family members shall be terminated if 3there is a final denial of that person's visa or asylum 4application under Section 1101(a)(15)(T), 1101(a)(15)(U), or 51158 of Title 8 of the United States Code. The final denial of 6an application must be the result of a final administrative or 7judicial determination after all appeals and challenges have 8been exhausted. 9    (b) A person who is a foreign-born victim of trafficking, 10torture, or other serious crimes and his or her derivative 11family members shall be ineligible for continued State-funded 12cash assistance or SNAP benefits provided under this Article 13if that person has not filed a formal application for status 14pursuant to Section 1101(a)(15)(T), 1101(a)(15)(U), or 1158 of 15Title 8 of the United States Code within one year after the 16date of his or her application for cash assistance or SNAP 17benefits provided under this Article. The Department of Human 18Services may extend the person's and his or her derivative 19family members' eligibility for medical assistance, cash 20assistance, or SNAP benefits beyond one year if the Department 21determines that the person, during the year of initial 22eligibility (i) experienced a health crisis, (ii) has been 23unable, after reasonable attempts, to obtain necessary 24information from a third party, or (iii) has other extenuating 25circumstances that prevented the person from completing his or 26her application for status.  HB4831- 12 -LRB104 19919 KTG 33369 b1(Source: P.A. 99-870, eff. 8-22-16; 100-201, eff. 8-18-17.) 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 3becoming law.